apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="дав/ить__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>ить</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ивш</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ил</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ила</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ило</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>или</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ящ</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>лю</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ишь</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ит</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ят</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>овать</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уй</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уйте</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овав</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ованн</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>овавш</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>овал</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овала</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овало</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овали</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ую</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уем</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уешь</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уете</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ует</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уют</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>ать</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>авш</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ал</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ала</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ало</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>али</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ащ</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ишь</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ит</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ат</l><r>ать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>ечь</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еки</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еките</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ечённ</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ёкш</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ёк</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>екла</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>екло</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>екли</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еку</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ечём</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ечёшь</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ечёте</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ечёт</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>екут</l><r>ечь<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 

    <e lm="арестовать"><i>арест</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="давить"><i>дав</i><par n="дав/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="держать"><i>держ</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="дышать"><i>дыш</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="задействовать"><i>задейств</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="кормить"><i>корм</i><par n="дав/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="ловить"><i>лов</i><par n="дав/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="любить"><i>люб</i><par n="дав/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="нарисовать"><i>нарис</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="попробовать"><i>попроб</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="потребовать"><i>потреб</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="почувствовать"><i>почувств</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="привлечь"><i>привл</i><par n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="сбалансировать"><i>сбалансир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="содержать"><i>содерж</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="отвлечь"><i>отвл</i><par n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="отремонтировать"><i>отремонтир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="вовлечь"><i>вовл</i><par n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="запланировать"><i>запланир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="застраховать"><i>застрах</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="затребовать"><i>затреб</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="зафиксировать"><i>зафиксир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="заинтересовать"><i>заинтересовать</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="заинтересоваться"><i>заинтересоваться</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="знакомить"><i>знаком</i><par n="дав/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="пересечь"><i>перес</i><par n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="подлежать"><i>подлеж</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="согласовать"><i>соглас</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="воображать"><i>воображ</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="согласовать"><i>соглас</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="воображать"><i>воображ</i><par n="дыш/ать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="популяризовать"><i>популяриз</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="приватизировать"><i>приватизир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="обречь"><i>обр</i><par n="привл/ечь__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="проголосовать"><i>проголос</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="профинансировать"><i>профинансир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="сфальсифицировать"><i>сфальсифицир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="спровоцировать"><i>спровоцир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="сформовать"><i>сформ</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="сформулировать"><i>сформулир</i><par n="нарис/овать__vblex_perf"/></e>
